Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1045HV (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 388 Section 1. Section 483A.8, subsection 3, paragraph e, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 e. The commission shall assign one preference point to a 3 nonresident whose application for a nonresident antlered or any 4 sex deer hunting license is denied due to limitations on the 5 number of nonresident antlered or any sex deer hunting licenses 6 available for issuance that year. An additional preference 7 point shall be assigned to that person each subsequent year 8 the personâs license application is denied for that reason. A 9 nonresident may purchase additional preference points pursuant 10 to rules adopted pursuant to section 483A.1 . The first 11 nonresident antlered or any sex deer hunting license drawing 12 each year shall be made from the pool of applicants with the 13 most preference points and continue to pools of applicants 14 with successively fewer preference points until sixty-five 15 percent of all available nonresident antlered or any sex deer 16 hunting licenses have been issued. The remaining thirty-five 17 percent of nonresident antlered or any sex deer licenses 18 shall be distributed by a random drawing of applications 19 without considering preference points of the applicants. If 20 a nonresident applicant receives an antlered or any sex deer 21 hunting license, all of the applicantâs assigned preference 22 points at that time shall be removed. 23